Maryland, session 2025, HB1547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
4–201.
There is a State Board of Barbers in the Department.
4–302.
(a) To qualify for a license to practice barbering or a barber–stylist limited license,
an applicant shall be an individual who meets the requirements of this section.
(b) (1) An applicant for a barber license shall have completed successfully:
(i) 1. a required program of at least 1,200 hours of training in a
barber school that is approved by the State Department of Education or the Maryland
Higher Education Commission, in consultation with the Board; or
[(ii)] 2. an apprenticeship of at least 2,250 hours within 2 years in
a barbershop that holds a barbershop permit under the supervision of a master barber;
AND
(II) 1 HOUR OF IN–PERSON OR VIRTUAL TRAINING IN DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE AWARENESS UNDER § 4–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) If the applicant for a barber license is an individual trained and
currently licensed as a cosmetologist in the State, the Board shall:

HOUSE BILL 1547 3
(i) credit the applicant with having met one–half of the training
requirement of paragraph [(1)] (1)(I) of this subsection; and
(ii) determine the manner in which the credit will be applied.
(3) The Board may credit an applicant with the number of hours of training
the applicant completes in a barber school toward the number of hours required for an
apprenticeship if the barber school where the applicant completes the training:
(i) is located in a detention center or correctional facility; and
(ii) 1. is approved by the State Department of Education or the
Maryland Higher Education Commission; or
2. has a curriculum similar to one that is approved by the
State Department of Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission.
(4) The Board may not credit more than 600 hours of training to an
individual under paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(c) (1) An applicant for a barber–stylist limited license shall have completed
successfully:
(i) 1. a required program of at least 900 hours of training in a
barber school that is approved by the State Department of Education or the Maryland
Higher Education Commission, in consultation with the Board; or
[(ii)] 2. an apprenticeship of at least 1,650 hours within 18 months
in a barbershop that holds a barbershop permit under the supervision of a master barber;
AND
(II) 1 HOUR OF IN–PERSON OR VIRTUAL TRAINING IN DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE AWARENESS UNDER § 4–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) If the applicant for a barber–stylist license is an individual trained and
currently licensed as a cosmetologist in the State, the Board shall:
(i) credit the applicant with having met one–half of the training
requirement of paragraph [(1)] (1)(I) of this subsection; and
(ii) determine the manner in which the credit will be applied.
(3) The Board may credit an applicant with the number of hours of training
the applicant completes in a barber school toward the number of hours required for an
apprenticeship if the barber school where the applicant completes the training:

HOUSE BILL 1547
(i) is located in a detention center or correctional facility; and
(ii) 1. is approved by the State Department of Education or the
Maryland Higher Education Commission; or
2. has a curriculum similar to one that is approved by the
State Department of Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission.
(4) The Board may not credit more than 450 hours of training to an
individual under paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(d) An applicant for a master barber license shall have at least 15 months of
experience as a barber.
(e) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, an applicant for a master
barber license shall pass an examination given by the Board or the Board’s designee under
this subtitle.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, an applicant for a barber
license shall pass an examination given by the Board or the Board’s designee under this
subtitle.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, an applicant for a
barber–stylist limited license shall pass an examination given by the Board or the Board’s
designee under this subtitle.
4–302.1.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND ADMINISTER A 1–HOUR
TRAINING FOR DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AWARENESS APPROVE TRAINING PROGRAMS
THAT AN INDIVIDUAL MAY COMPLETE TO SATISFY THE DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
AWARENESS TRAINING REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE.
(B) THE A TRAINING DEVELOPED PROGRAM APPROVED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL MUST:
(1) BE OFFERED IN PERSON AND VIRTUALLY;
(2) INCLUDE GUIDANCE ON:
(I) RECOGNIZING THE SIGNS OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE;
(II) STRATEGIES TO NAVIGATE CONVERSATIONS WITH CLIENTS
WHO MAY BE VICTIMS OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE;

HOUSE BILL 1547 5
(III) HOW TO LISTEN TO AND COMMUNICATE WITH VICTIMS OF
DOMESTIC VIOLENCE; AND
(IV) CONNECTING CLIENTS WITH RESOURCES AND SUPPORT
GROUPS FOR VICTIMS OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE; AND
(3) BE PROVIDED TO EACH APPLICANT OR LICENSEE FREE OF
CHARGE HAVE A DURATION OF AT LEAST 1 HOUR.
5–201.
There is a State Board of Cosmetologists in the Department.
5–304.
(a) (1) To qualify for a license to practice as a cosmetologist, an applicant shall
be an individual who meets the requirements of this section.
(2) The applicant shall be at least 17 years old.
(3) The applicant shall have completed successfully a 9th grade education
or the equivalent.
(4) (i) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an applicant
shall have received training by:
1. serving as a registered apprentice as provided under §§
5–404 and 5–405(e) of this title; or
2. successfully completing a required program of at least
1,500 hours of training in a cosmetology school that is approved by the State Board of
Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in consultation with the Board.
(ii) If an applicant is a barber or master barber currently licensed in
this State, the Board shall:
1. credit the applicant with having met one–half of the
training requirements of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph; and
2. determine the manner in which the credit will be applied.
(iii) An applicant meets the requirements of this subsection if:
1. the applicant has held a cosmetologist license in another
state or foreign country and has actively practiced cosmetology in the other state or foreign
country for a period of 6 months; or

HOUSE BILL 1547
2. the applicant has been trained in a cosmetology school in
another state or foreign country that has standards substantially equivalent to or more
stringent than the standards of a school that is approved by the State Board of Education
or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in consultation with the Board.
(5) THE APPLICANT SHALL HAVE COMPLETED 1 HOUR OF IN–PERSON
OR VIRTUAL TRAINING IN DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AWARENESS UNDER § 5–305.1 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
[(5)] (6) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, the applicant shall
pass a written and practical examination given by the Board under this subtitle.
(b) To qualify for a license as a senior cosmetologist, an applicant shall:
(1) have 2 years of experience as a licensed cosmetologist; and
(2) pass an examination approved by the Board.
5–305.
(a) To qualify for a limited license to practice cosmetology, an applicant shall be
an individual who meets the requirements of this section.
(b) An applicant for a limited license to provide esthetic services shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have completed successfully a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
[and]
(3) have received training by:
(i) serving as a registered apprentice for at least 6 months as
provided under §§ 5–404 and 5–405 of this title; or
(ii) successfully completing at least 600 hours of instruction in
providing esthetic services in a cosmetology school approved by the State Department of
Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in consultation with the Board;
AND
(4) HAVE COMPLETED 1 HOUR OF IN–PERSON OR VIRTUAL TRAINING
IN DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AWARENESS UNDER § 5–305.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(c) An applicant for a limited license to provide hair services shall:

HOUSE BILL 1547 7
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have completed successfully a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
[and]
(3) have received training by:
(i) serving as a registered apprentice for at least 15 months as
provided under §§ 5–404 and 5–405 of this title; or
(ii) successfully completing at least 1,200 hours of instruction
providing hair services in a cosmetology school approved by the State Department of
Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in consultation with the Board;
AND
(4) HAVE COMPLETED 1 HOUR OF IN–PERSON OR VIRTUAL TRAINING
IN DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AWARENESS.
(d) An applicant for a limited license to provide hair services – blow drying shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have completed successfully a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
[and]
(3) have received training by successfully completing at least 350 hours of
instruction providing hair services – blow drying in a cosmetology school approved by the
State Department of Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in
consultation with the Board; AND
(4) HAVE COMPLETED 1 HOUR OF IN–PERSON OR VIRTUAL TRAINING
IN DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AWARENESS.
(e) An applicant for a limited license to provide nail technician services shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have successfully completed a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
[and]
(3) have received training by:
(i) serving as a registered apprentice for at least 3 months as
provided under §§ 5–404 and 5–405 of this title; or

HOUSE BILL 1547
(ii) successfully completing at least 250 hours of instruction in
providing nail technician services in a cosmetology school approved by the State
Department of Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in consultation
with the Board; AND
(4) HAVE COMPLETED 1 HOUR OF IN–PERSON OR VIRTUAL TRAINING
IN DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AWARENESS UNDER § 5–305.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(f) If an applicant is licensed to practice as an esthetician, hairstylist,
hairstylist – blow drying technician, or nail technician in another state or foreign country,
the applicant meets the training requirements of this section if the applicant has held a
limited license in the other state or foreign country and has actively practiced in the other
state or foreign country for a period of 6 months.
(g) An applicant for a limited license shall pass an examination given by the
Board under this subtitle.
5–305.1.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND ADMINISTER A 1–HOUR
TRAINING FOR DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AWARENESS APPROVE TRAINING PROGRAMS
THAT AN INDIVIDUAL MAY COMPLETE TO SATISFY THE DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
AWARENESS TRAINING REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE.
(B) THE A TRAINING DEVELOPED PROGRAM APPROVED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL MUST:
(1) BE OFFERED IN PERSON AND VIRTUALLY;
(2) INCLUDE GUIDANCE ON:
(I) RECOGNIZING THE SIGNS OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE;
(II) STRATEGIES TO NAVIGATE CONVERSATIONS WITH CLIENTS
WHO MAY BE VICTIMS OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE;
(III) HOW TO LISTEN TO AND COMMUNICATE WITH VICTIMS OF
DOMESTIC VIOLENCE; AND
(IV) CONNECTING CLIENTS WITH RESOURCES AND SUPPORT
GROUPS FOR VICTIMS OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE; AND
(3) BE PROVIDED TO EACH APPLICANT OR LICENSEE FREE OF
CHARGE HAVE A DURATION OF AT LEAST 1 HOUR.

HOUSE BILL 1547 9
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The State Board of Barbers shall require an individual who holds a license or
a limited license issued under Title 4 of the Business Occupations and Professions Article
before October 1, 2025, to complete the domestic violence awareness training under §
4–302.1 of the Business Occupations and Professions Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this
Act, as a requirement for only the next renewal of the license or limited license.
(b) The State Board of Cosmetologists shall require an individual who holds a
license or limited license issued under Title 5 of the Business Occupations and Professions
Article before October 1, 2025, to complete the domestic violence awareness training under
§ 5–305.1 of the Business Occupations and Professions Article, as enacted by Section 1 of
this Act, as a requirement for only the next renewal of the license or limited license.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025 January 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.